Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-145.02
Employers; reports required.

Every employer shall upon request of the administrator of the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court report to the administrator (1) the number of its employees and the nature and location of their work, (2) the name of the workers' compensation insurer with whom the employer has insured its liability under the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act and the number and date of expiration of such policy, and (3) the employer's federal employer identification number or numbers. Failure to furnish such report within ten days from the making of a request by certified or registered mail shall constitute presumptive evidence that the delinquent employer is violating section 48-145.01.

Laws 1971, LB 572, § 19;

Laws 1972, LB 1061, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 69;

Laws 2005, LB 13, § 10.